Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 27 Truth in Lending and Retail Selling

6-27-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be known and cited as “The Rhode Island Truth in Lending and Retail Selling Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 223, § 1.

6-27-2.
Declaration of purpose.

The general assembly finds that economic stabilization would be enhanced and that competition among the various financial institutions and other firms engaged in the extension of consumer credit would be strengthened by the informed use of credit. The informed use of credit results from an awareness of the cost of credit by consumers. It is the purpose of this chapter to assure a meaningful disclosure of credit terms so that the consumer will be able to compare more readily the various credit terms available to him or her and thus avoid the uninformed use of credit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 223, § 1.

6-27-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Credit” means any loan, mortgage, deed of trust, advance, or discount; any conditional sales contract; any contract to sell, or sale or contract of sale of property or services either for present or future delivery, under which part or all of the price is payable subsequent to the making of the sale or contract and the creditor imposes a finance charge; any contract or arrangement for the hire, bailment, or leasing of property in connection with which the creditor imposes a finance charge; any option, demand, lien, pledge, or other claim against or for the delivery of property or money; any purchase, or other acquisition of, or any credit upon the security of, any obligation or claim arising out of any of the foregoing; and any transaction or series of transactions having a similar purpose or effect.

“Creditor” means any person engaged in the business of extending credit, including any person who as a regular business practice makes loans or sells or rents property or services on a time, credit, or installment basis, either as principal or as agent, who requires, as an incident to the extension of credit, the payment of a finance charge.

“Director” means the director of business regulation.

“Official fees” means the fees prescribed by law for filing, recording, or otherwise perfecting or releasing or satisfying any title, lien, or security interest retained or taken by a creditor in connection with the extension of credit.

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, or other organized group of persons, or the legal successor or representative of the foregoing.

“Revolving or open-end credit plan” means a credit plan prescribing the terms of credit transactions exclusive of cash advances under the plans.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 481, § 2.

6-27-4.
Maximum charge — Refunds.

No creditor shall impose a finance charge in excess of an amount equal to eighteen percent (18%) simple interest per annum. This subsection shall not apply to any transaction in connection with which the finance charge does not exceed ten dollars ($10.00). Notwithstanding the provision of any retail installment contract to the contrary, a buyer may prepay in full the unpaid balance of any retail installment contract at any time before its final due date and, if the buyer does so, shall receive a refund credit on the retail installment contract for the prepayment. The amount of the refund credit of finance charges on precomputed loans, made for an original term of sixty (60) months or less, may be calculated on the method commonly referred to as the rule of 78s or sum of the digits. Refund credits of finance charges on precomputed loans, made for an original term greater than sixty (60) months, must be at least the amount as that produced by the rule of anticipation.

Where the amount of refund credit is less than one dollar ($1.00), no refund credit need be made.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, the maximum finance charge that may be applied under a revolving or open-end credit plan in connection with a transaction arising out of a retail sale of consumer goods, including the retail sale of gasoline or services, shall not exceed the rate or rates agreed to by the creditor and a retail buyer compared on the average daily balance of the open-end or revolving account or the unpaid balance of the open-end or revolving account outstanding as of the end of the current billing cycle. Regardless of any agreement to the contrary, a transaction under a revolving or open-end credit plan is subject to this section whenever a solicitation for the extension of credit is made by a creditor whose primary activity in Rhode Island is soliciting Rhode Island customers through the mails and the solicitation originates outside Rhode Island but is directed to, and received by, a retail buyer who resides and responds to the solicitation in Rhode Island.

This section shall not apply to any person doing business under and as permitted by any general or special law of this state or of the United States relating to: (1) financial institutions, (2) credit unions, or (3) licensees pursuant to title 19, chapter 44 of title 6, and §

6-26-2

.

Under each revolving or open-end credit plan a late fee not to exceed twelve dollars ($12.00) may be assessed on each minimum payment not paid in full within forty (40) days following the billing date of the statement on which the minimum payment first appears.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 303, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 436, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 359, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 481, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 59; P.L. 1995, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 11; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 17.

6-27-5.
Consumer notes.

If any contract between a retail seller and a retail buyer for the sale of consumer goods and services requires or involves the execution of a promissory note by a retail buyer in connection with an extension of credit by the retail seller, or by a creditor to whom the retail buyer was referred by the retail seller and to whom the retail seller regularly, as part of the ordinary conduct of its business and with the actual knowledge of the creditor, refers retail buyers for credit, the words “nonnegotiable consumer note” shall be placed prominently on the note and an assignee of a note with the words “nonnegotiable consumer note” appearing prominently on the note shall take the note subject to the claims and defenses permitted under §

6A-3-306

, irrespective of whether or not the assignee qualifies as a “holder in due course” as defined in §

6A-3-302

. For the purposes of this section “consumer goods” means tangible personal property used or bought for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

A creditor who obtains a note from the maker in violation of this section shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

If a note is obtained by a creditor from a maker in violation of this section, no finance, delinquency, collection, repossession, or refinancing charges may be recovered in any action or proceeding based on the contract for sale by the creditor and if the charges are recovered from a maker by a holder in due course, the maker may recover the charges from the creditor who violated the provisions of this section.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any notes executed in connection with any financing that is insured under federal housing administration regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 170, § 1; as redesignated by P.L. 1970, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 17.

6-27-6.
Regulations.

The director shall prescribe any rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter that may be necessary or proper in carrying out its provisions.

It is the expressed intention of this legislature that if exemption from the law or regulation of the federal government of the disclosure class of credit transactions covered hereby cannot be affected, the laws of the federal government shall preempt the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 147, § 1; as redesignated by P.L. 1970, ch. 223, § 1.

6-27-7.
Civil and criminal penalties.

Any creditor who in connection with any credit transaction willfully imposes a finance charge in violation of §

6-27-4

or any regulation issued under §

6-27-4

, shall be liable to the person in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100), or in an amount equal to twice the finance charge required by the creditor in connection with the transaction, whichever is the greater, except that the liabilities shall not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) on any credit transaction. An action to recover the penalty may be brought by the person within one year from the date of the occurrence of the violation, in any court of competent jurisdiction. In any action under this subsection in which any person is entitled to a recovery, the creditor shall be liable for reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs as determined by the court.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of §

6-27-4

or any regulation issued under §

6-27-4

shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

Except as specified in subsection (a) of this section, nothing contained in this chapter or any regulation issued under this chapter shall affect the validity or enforceability of any contract or transaction.

No punishment or penalty provided by this chapter shall apply to the United States or any agency of the United States, or to any state, any political subdivision of a state, or any agency of any state or political subdivision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 147, § 1; as redesignated by P.L. 1970, ch. 223, § 1.

6-27-8.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of any provision of this chapter to any person or circumstance is held unconstitutional, the remainder of this chapter and the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby, and it shall be conclusively presumed that the legislature would have enacted the remainder of this chapter without the invalid or unconstitutional provision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 147, § 1; as redesignated by P.L. 1970, ch. 223, § 1.

6-27-9.
Retail sales — Refunds.

Except where a customer has been clearly informed by either a poster or other appropriate notice placed at the point of display or at the cash register or at the store entrance that all sales are final and that the merchandise is not returnable, wherever a customer who has paid cash for an item, and who has in his or her possession a sales slip or other evidence that he or she has purchased the item in a retail outlet, returns the item, unused, within ten (10) business days from the date of purchase, he or she shall be entitled to a refund in the same manner as paid in an amount equivalent to that paid at the time of sale.

This section shall not apply to the sale of books, magazines, or any publications; food; perishable items; merchandise that is substantially custom-made or custom-finished; items for internal consumption; items sold “as is”; or any items presently prohibited for refund, return, or exchange by a retailer by federal or state law or any rule or regulation promulgated by any state agency.

Any person, corporation, or entity, refusing or neglecting to post in accordance with subsection (a), shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor for each violation and shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 281, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 299, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 299, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 17.

6-27-10.
Disclosure.

Any application form or written solicitation for a revolving or open-end credit plan provided or offered by a creditor to a resident of this state shall contain or be accompanied by either of the following disclosures:

A disclosure of each of the following, if applicable:

Any periodic interest or finance charge rate that may be applied to the credit card account, expressed as an annual percentage rate, or in the case of a credit card account with a variable rate, the means for determining that rate;

If two (2) or more periodic rates may be used to compute the finance charge, each rate, the range of balances to which each rate is applicable, and the corresponding annual percentage rate with respect to each periodic rate;

Any membership, participation, or other similar fee imposed for the issuance of a credit card or, if the creditor does not impose a fee, the disclosure shall so indicate;

The period within which any credit extended or principal amount withdrawn from a credit card account shall be repaid to avoid incurring a finance charge, and if no period is offered that fact shall be stated, except that a creditor may, at its option and without disclosure, impose no finance charge when payment is received after the time period’s expiration; and

Any per-transaction fee or similar fee; or

A disclosure that satisfies the initial disclosure statement requirements of “Regulation Z”.

Any information required to be disclosed pursuant to this section shall be disclosed in a clear and conspicuous manner.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to oral solicitations or solicitations made through or applications contained in a catalogue, magazine, newspaper, or other print media that is mailed or otherwise distributed to people in more than one state.

A creditor need not present the disclosures required by subsection (a) of this section in chart form or use any specific terminology except as expressly provided in this section. The following chart shall not be construed in any way as a standard by which to determine whether a creditor that elects not to use the chart has provided the required disclosures in a manner that satisfies subsection (a) of this section. However, disclosures shall be conclusively presumed to satisfy the requirements of subsection (a) of this section if a chart with captions substantially as follows is completed with the applicable terms offered by the creditor or if the creditor presents the applicable terms in tabular, list, or narrative format using terminology substantially similar to the captions included in the following chart:

For the purposes of this section, “Regulation Z” means the regulation promulgated and as amended by the Federal Reserve Board pursuant to the Federal Truth in Lending Provisions of the “Consumer Credit Protection Act,” 15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed or construed to prohibit a creditor from disclosing additional terms, conditions, or information, whether or not relating to the disclosures required under this section, in conjunction with the disclosures required by this section.

This section does not apply to any application form or written solicitation for a revolving or open-end credit plan where the credit to be extended will be secured by a lien on real property.

Any person who knowingly and willfully violates any provision of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation. Any application or solicitation violating this section shall be treated as a single violation regardless of the number of applications or solicitations distributed.

ANNUALPER-CENTAGERATE VARIABLERATE INDEXANDSPREAD ANNUALIZEDMEMBERSHIPORPARTICI-PATIONFEE MINIMUMCHARGETRANSACTIONFEE FREE-RIDEPERIOD

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 515, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 17.

6-27-11.
Additional disclosures.

In the case of any open-end consumer credit plan secured by a consumer’s principal residence, the following provisions shall apply:

The disclosures required by subdivisions (2) and (3) of this section shall be provided to the consumer on a separate document on or before the closing date.

The following information shall be disclosed:

The annual percentage rate that will be in effect when credit is first extended in connection with the loan or a description of the manner in which the rate will be computed;

The manner in which any changes in the annual percentage rate of interest will be made, and the timing of any changes, including any index or other rate of interest to which the changes in rates are related;

Any fee imposed for the availability of the account, including but not limited to, annual fees, application fees, and the fees commonly designated as “points”;

In the case of a variable rate, the maximum annual percentage rate that may be imposed at any time under the plan and the maximum amount by which the annual percentage rate may change in any one-year period. If no limit exists, that fact shall be disclosed;

The maximum interest payment for a thirty-day (30)period at the highest interest rate permitted under the terms of the open-end plan and based on the maximum amount of credit available under the plan;

A statement that the plan is secured by the consumer’s dwelling and, in the event of any default, the consumer risks the loss of the home;

If applicable, a statement that the disclosures are good-faith estimates of the terms and conditions applicable to the plan, and are subject to change before the plan is opened;

If applicable, a statement that the creditor has the right to change the terms and conditions during the plan, including the index and margin used to determine the interest rate and payment amount, at any time; and

If applicable, a statement that although interest-only payments may be less on a monthly basis, they retire no principal, prolong the obligation, and result in greater total expenses over the life of the loan.

In addition to the requirements of this chapter, any advertisement to aid, promote, or assist, directly or indirectly, the extension of consumer credit through an open-end credit plan secured by the consumer’s principal dwelling that states a specific monthly payment based on a variable rate of interest shall state all of the following terms:

Any maximum or fixed amount that could be imposed; and

The periodic rates expressed as annual percentage rates.

If any advertisement described in subdivision (3)(i) contains a statement that any interest expense incurred with respect to a plan is or may be tax deductible, the advertisement shall include a clear and conspicuous statement that the interest expense may not be completely deductible for all taxpayers.

No advertisement described in subdivision (3)(i) with respect to any home equity loan may refer to the loan as “free money or easy money.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 246, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 17.